Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 7
ADMINISTRATION AND FEES

11-51-701. Division of securities - creation - powers and duties.

There is created the division of securities in the department of regulatory agencies, the head of which is the commissioner of securities, who shall be appointed by the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, and the securities board. The division of securities and the office of commissioner of securities are

type 1

entities, as defined in section 24-1-105. The division is responsible for the administration of the provisions of articles 51, 53, and 59 of this title 11 and part 7 of article 75 of title 24, and shall perform such other duties as are imposed upon it by law.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 734, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 2425, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 327, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1845, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3391, § 106, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-103 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

11-51-702. Division subject to termination. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 734, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 678, § 7, effective April 20.

Editor's note:

Prior to its repeal, this section was similar to former § 11-51-104 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-702.5. Securities board - creation - duties - repeal.

There is hereby created the securities board within the department of regulatory agencies which shall consist of five persons appointed by the governor, subject to the consent and approval of the senate, as follows:

Two persons who are licensed by the state supreme court to practice law in the state of Colorado and who are conversant in securities law;

One person certified as a certified public accountant pursuant to article 100 of title 12; and

Two persons who are members of the public at large.

One of the members of the securities board shall reside west of the continental divide.

The members shall serve terms of three years with each term ending on July 1 of the year in which the term expires.

Any vacancy on the securities board occurring before the expiration of the term shall be filled by the governor for the remainder of the term.

Securities board members may be removed for cause.

Securities board members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses, not to include out-of-state travel expenses.

Members of the board shall not serve more than two consecutive terms on the board.

(2.5) The securities board is a

type 1

entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

Securities board members shall be subject to the conflict of interest limitations placed on other employees of the division of securities pursuant to section 11-51-703 (2).

The securities board shall provide oversight to the securities commissioner and shall be available to advise the securities commissioner at the request of the securities commissioner on issues affecting the division of securities and securities regulations in the state.

The securities board shall meet as often as is necessary, but no less than quarterly. Meetings may be called by the chairperson of the securities board at the request of the securities commissioner or any member of the securities board.

The securities board shall aid and advise the securities commissioner at the request of the securities commissioner in connection with the duties of the securities commissioner under articles 51, 53, and 59 of this title and part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., including but not limited to the promulgation of rules, issuance of orders, formulation of policies, and the setting of fees under such articles and other issues affecting the division of securities and securities regulation in the state.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2004.)

The securities board shall hear the matters described in section

11-51-606

(1.5)(d), (3)(e), and (4)(d) and issue the initial decisions as provided therein. The chairperson of the securities board shall determine the date and place for such hearings and may appoint a panel of the securities board consisting of no less than three board members to conduct such hearings. Any hearing held regarding an order issued by the securities commissioner under section

11-51-606 (3)

or (4) shall be heard by the securities board.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2026.

Prior to such repeal, the functions of the securities board shall be reviewed as provided for in section 24-34-104, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1845, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(6)(c) amended, p. 1467, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(6)(c) amended, p. 802, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2)(f) added and (6)(b) and (7)(a) amended, p. 15, §§ 2, 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2)(b), (2)(f), and (7)(a) amended, (SB 15-102), ch. 249, p. 910, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1660, § 61, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(2.5) added, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3391, § 107, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado.

11-51-703. Administration of article.

The securities commissioner is hereby empowered to administer and enforce all provisions of this article and to provide the division of securities with such books, records, files, and printing and other supplies and employ such officers and clerical and other assistance as may be necessary in the securities commissioner's discretion to perform the duties required of the securities commissioner under this article.

It is unlawful for the securities commissioner or any of the officers or employees of the division of securities to use for personal benefit any information which is filed with or obtained by the securities commissioner and which is not made public. No provision of this article authorizes the securities commissioner or any of such officers or employees to disclose any such information except among themselves or when necessary or appropriate in a proceeding or investigation under this article. No provision of this article either creates or derogates from any privilege which exists at common law or otherwise when documentary or other evidence is sought under a subpoena directed to the securities commissioner or any of the officers or employees of the division of securities.

The securities commissioner may enter into an arrangement, agreement, or other working relationship with federal, other state, and self-regulatory authorities whereby public documents may be initially filed and maintained in the central registration depository, the investment adviser registration depository, or with other agencies or authorities. It is the intent of this subsection (3) that the securities commissioner be provided with the power to reduce the duplication of filings, reduce administrative costs, and, in conjunction with other states and with federal authorities, establish uniform procedures, forms, and administration to be used by this state and by such other states and by such federal authorities.

The securities commissioner may delegate to any officer of the division of securities any power, duty, authority, or function created by this article and vested in the securities commissioner, but nothing in this subsection (4) shall authorize the securities commissioner to delegate to any officer the securities commissioner's authority to make rules, institute proceedings or actions under section 11-51-306, 11-51-410, or 11-51-602, refer evidence under section 11-51-603 (3), or exercise the authority created by this section, section 11-51-704 (1) or (2), or section 11-51-707 (3)(a) or (3)(b).

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 734, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 16, § 3, effective March 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-117 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-704. Rules, forms, and orders.

The securities commissioner may, from time to time, make, amend, and rescind such rules, forms, and orders as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this article, including rules and forms governing registration statements, applications, and reports, and defining any terms, whether or not used in this article, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article. For the purpose of rules and forms, the securities commissioner may classify securities, persons, and matters within the securities commissioner's jurisdiction and prescribe different requirements for different classes.

No rule, form, or order may be made, amended, or rescinded unless the securities commissioner finds that the action is necessary or appropriate in the public interest and is consistent with the purposes and provisions of this article. In prescribing rules and forms, the securities commissioner may cooperate with the securities and exchange commission with a view to effectuating the policy of this article to achieve maximum uniformity in the form and content of registration statements, applications, and reports wherever practicable.

The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, prescribe the form and content of financial statements required under this article, the circumstances under which consolidated financial statements shall be filed, and whether any required financial statements shall be certified by independent or certified public accountants. Unless the securities commissioner by rule or order provides otherwise, a financial statement required under this article must be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles or other accounting principles as are prescribed for the issuer of the financial statement by the securities and exchange commission.

No provision of this article imposing any liability upon a person or providing a basis for any sanction against a person applies to any act done or omitted in good faith and in conformity with any rule, form, or order of the securities commissioner, notwithstanding that the rule, form, or order may later be amended or rescinded or be determined by any judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 735, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-118 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-705. Interpretive opinions.

The securities commissioner may honor requests from interested persons for confirmation of the applicability of particular exemptions from securities registration under sections 11-51-307 to 11-51-309 or for other interpretive opinions regarding any provision of this article. Any person making such a request shall pay an opinion fee, which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-51-707 and which shall not be refundable. In response to any request for a confirmation or other interpretive opinion received under this section, the securities commissioner may waive any condition imposed under this article as it applies to the person making such request.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 736, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-126 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-706. Consent to service of process.

An applicant for licensing under this article, a person filing a registration statement under this article, and an issuer who proposes to offer in this state through an agent a security registered under this article shall file with the securities commissioner, in such form as the securities commissioner by rule prescribes, an irrevocable consent appointing the securities commissioner or the successor in office of the securities commissioner to be the attorney for said person to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against such person, or the successor, executor, or administrator of such person, arising under this article or any rule or order under this article after the consent has been filed with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent.

A person who has filed a consent in compliance with subsection (1) of this section in connection with a previous application for licensing or registration need not file an additional consent, but the securities commissioner may request, and in response to such request such person shall provide, verification of such previous consent.

Service upon any person who has filed a consent pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the securities commissioner, but it is not effective unless the plaintiff, who may be the securities commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by the securities commissioner, forthwith sends a notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered mail to the defendant or respondent at the last address on file with the securities commissioner and unless the plaintiff's affidavit of compliance with this subsection (3) is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

The methods of service of process provided for in this section are in addition to other methods of service of process provided for by law, including section 13-1-124, C.R.S. Any violation of this article shall be deemed to constitute the transaction of business within this state for the purpose of section 13-1-124, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 736, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-127 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-707. Collection of fees - division of securities cash fund created.

A fee payable under this article shall be deemed paid when the securities commissioner receives the payment.

The securities commissioner shall transmit all fees collected under this article, not including fees retained by contractors pursuant to contracts entered into in accordance with section 11-51-405 or 24-34-101, C.R.S., to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the division of securities cash fund, which fund is hereby created. Pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the general assembly shall make annual appropriations from said fund for expenditures of the division of securities. The expenditures incurred by the division shall be made out of such appropriations upon vouchers and warrants drawn pursuant to law. All moneys credited to the division of securities cash fund shall be used as provided in this section and shall not be deposited in or transferred to the general fund of this state or any other fund.

The division shall set the amount of each fee that it is authorized by law to collect under this article 51. The budget request and the fees for the division must reflect direct and indirect costs. The division, in the discretion of the securities commissioner, may set:

Registration fees payable under section 11-51-302, according to a scale of rates applied to the dollar amount of securities to be registered, with a maximum fee specified;

A notice filing fee and notice filing renewal fee payable under section 11-51-304.5 for each series, portfolio, separate account, or fund of an open-end management company or unit investment trust;

Registration fees payable under section 11-51-905 (4), according to a scale of rates applied to the asset size of the trust fund as of the date of registration; and

Annual fees payable under section 11-51-906 (4)(e), according to a scale of rates applied to the asset size of the trust fund as of the date of the filing of the annual audit.

Based upon the appropriation made and subject to the approval of the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies, the division shall set its fees for a fiscal year so that the revenue generated from said fees approximates its direct and indirect costs, including statewide indirect costs. Such fees for a fiscal year may be adjusted by the securities commissioner no more often than twice during that fiscal year.

On July 1 each year, whenever moneys appropriated to the division for its activities for the prior fiscal year are unexpended, said moneys shall be made a part of the appropriation to the division for the next fiscal year, and such amount shall not be raised from fees collected by the division. If a supplemental appropriation is made to the division for its activities, its fees, when adjusted for the fiscal year next following that in which the supplemental appropriation was made, shall be adjusted by an additional amount which is sufficient to compensate for such supplemental appropriation. Funds appropriated to the division in the annual long appropriations bill shall be designated as a cash fund and shall not exceed the amount anticipated to be raised from fees collected by the division.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 737, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(3)(a) amended, p. 331, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1847, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1253, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2018:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 18-1388), ch. 280, p. 1757, § 6, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-129 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-708. Administrative files.

A document is filed when it is received by the securities commissioner.

The securities commissioner shall keep a register of all applications for licenses and registration statements which are or have ever been effective under this article and all orders which have been entered under this article. The register shall be open for public inspection.

The information contained in or filed with any registration statement, application, or report may be made available to the public under article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Upon request and at such reasonable charges as the securities commissioner prescribes, the securities commissioner shall furnish to any person photostatic or other copies of any entry in the register or any document which is a matter of public record and may certify their authenticity; and the securities commissioner may also provide certification of the absence of any entry in the register or the absence of any document or other record from division files which are of public record. In any action, proceeding, or prosecution under this article, any copy so certified, and any certification by the securities commissioner as to the absence of any such entry, document, or record from division files, are prima facie evidence of the contents of the entry, document, or record so certified or of the absence of the entry, document, or record which is the subject of such certification.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 738, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-126 as it existed prior to 1990.